Washington statutes.
RCW 10.101.005

Legislative finding.

The legislature finds that effective legal representation must be provided for indigent persons and persons who are indigent and able to contribute, consistent with the constitutional requirements of fairness, equal protection, and due process in all cases where the right to counsel attaches.

[ 2005 c 157 s 1; 1989 c 409 s 1.]